Utah statutes.
59-10-514.   Return filing requirements -- Rulemaking authority.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (3):

(a)  an individual income tax return filed for a tax imposed in accordance with Part 1, Determination and Reporting of Tax Liability and Information, shall be filed with the commission:

(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(a)(ii), on or before the 15th day of the fourth month following the last day of the taxpayer's taxable year; or

(ii)  on or before the day on which a federal individual income tax return is due under the Internal Revenue Code if the Internal Revenue Code provides a due date for filing that federal individual income tax return that is different from the due date described in Subsection (1)(a)(i);

(b)  a fiduciary income tax return filed for a tax imposed in accordance with Part 2, Trusts and Estates, shall be filed with the commission:

(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(ii), on or before the 15th day of the fourth month following the last day of the taxpayer's taxable year; or

(ii)  on or before the day on which a federal tax return for estates and trusts is due under the Internal Revenue Code if the Internal Revenue Code provides a due date for filing that federal tax return for estates and trusts that is different from the due date described in Subsection (1)(b)(i); or

(c)  a return filed in accordance with Section 59-10-507, shall be filed with the commission:

(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(c)(ii), in accordance with Section 59-10-507; or

(ii)  on or before the day on which a federal return of partnership income is due under the Internal Revenue Code if the Internal Revenue Code provides a due date for filing that federal return of partnership income that is different from the due date described in Subsection (1)(c)(i).

(2)  A person required to make and file a return under this chapter shall, without assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due:

(a)  to the commission; and

(b)  before the due date for filing the return determined without regard to any extension of time for filing the return.

(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may make rules prescribing what constitutes filing a return with the commission.

